New York, session 2025-2026, A8154.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 1 of section 169 of the execu- 2 tive law, as amended by section 9 of part A of chapter 60 of the laws of 3 2012, is amended to read as follows: 4 (c) commissioner of agriculture and markets, commissioner of [alcohol- 5 ism and substance abuse services] addiction services and supports, adju- 6 tant general, commissioner and president of state civil service commis- 7 sion, commissioner of economic development, [chair of the energy 8 research and development authority,] president of higher education 9 services corporation, commissioner of motor vehicles, member-chair of 10 board of parole, chair of public employment relations board, secretary 11 of state[, commissioner of alcoholism and substance abuse services], 12 executive director of the housing finance agency, commissioner of hous- 13 ing and community renewal, executive director of state insurance fund, 14 commissioner-chair of state liquor authority, chair of the workers' 15 compensation board; 16 § 2. Subdivisions 4 and 5 of section 1852 of the public authorities 17 law, subdivision 4 as amended by chapter 857 of the laws of 1977, and 18 subdivision 5 as amended by chapter 196 of the laws of 1980, are amended 19 to read as follows: 20 4. The members, including the chair, shall serve without compensation 21 for their services [as members], but they shall be entitled to 22 reimbursement for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the 23 performance of their official duties. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11797-02-5 A. 8154 2 1 5. Any member [(except the chairman), the commissioner of the depart- 2 ment of environmental conservation and the chairman of the public 3 service commission] may engage in private employment, or in a profession 4 or business, subject to the limitations contained in sections seventy- 5 three and seventy-four of the public officers law; provided however, 6 that notwithstanding any other provision of law, the members of the 7 authority who are officers of an electric utility or a utility primarily 8 engaged in the distribution of gas shall not be prohibited from partic- 9 ipating and voting on any bond issue of the authority relating to air 10 and water pollution facilities for any utility other than for the utili- 11 ties of which such members are officers respectively. The authority 12 shall, for the purposes of such sections, be a "state agency" and all 13 members, including the [chairman] chair, shall be "officers" of the 14 agency for the purposes of said sections. 15 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.